Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-403 Company action level event.
(a) "Company action level event" means any of the following events:

(1) The filing of a risk-based capital report by an
insurer which indicates that:

(A) The insurer's total adjusted capital is
greater than or equal to its regulatory action level risk-based capital but
less than its company action level risk-based capital;

(B) If a life or accident and health or
sickness insurer, the insurer has total adjusted capital greater than or equal
to its company action level risk-based capital but less than the product of its
authorized control level risk-based capital and three, and has a negative
trend;

(C) If a property and casualty insurer, the
insurer has a total adjusted capital greater than or equal to its company
action level risk-based capital but less than the product of its authorized
control level risk-based capital and three, and triggers the trend test
determined in accordance with the trend test calculation included in the
property and casualty risk-based capital instructions; or

(D) If a benefit society or health maintenance
organization, the benefit society or health maintenance organization has a
total adjusted capital greater than or equal to its company action level
risk-based capital but less than the product of its authorized control level
risk-based capital and three, and triggers the trend test determined in
accordance with the trend test calculation included in the health risk-based
capital instructions;

(2) The notification by the commissioner to the
insurer of an adjusted risk-based capital report that indicates the occurrence
of the event in paragraph (1), if the insurer does not challenge the adjusted
risk-based capital report under section 431:3-407; or

(3) If, pursuant to section 431:3-407, the insurer
challenges an adjusted risk-based capital report that indicates the occurrence
of the event in paragraph (1), the notification by the commissioner to the
insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing, rejected the insurer's
challenge.

(b) In the event of a company action level
event, the insurer shall prepare and submit to the commissioner a risk-based
capital plan which shall:

(1) Identify the conditions in the insurer which
contribute to the company action level event;

(2) Contain proposals of corrective actions which the
insurer intends to take and would be expected to result in the elimination of
the company action level event;

(3) Provide projections of the insurer's financial
results in the current year and at least the four succeeding years, both in the
absence of proposed corrective actions and giving effect to the proposed
corrective actions, including projections of statutory operating income, net
income, capital, and surplus. The projections for both new and renewal business
may include separate projections for each major line of business and separately
identify each significant income, expense, and benefit component;

(4) Identify the key assumptions having an impact on
the insurer's projections and the sensitivity of the projections to the
assumptions; and

(5) Identify the quality of, and problems associated
with, the insurer's business, including but not limited to its assets,
anticipated business growth and associated surplus strain, extraordinary
exposure to risk, mix of business, and use of reinsurance in each case, if any.

(c) The risk-based capital plan shall be
submitted:

(1) Within forty-five days of the company action
level event; or

(2) If the insurer challenges an adjusted risk-based
capital report pursuant to section 431:3-407, within forty-five days after
notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing,
rejected the insurer's challenge.

(d) Within sixty days after the submission by
an insurer of a risk-based capital plan to the commissioner, the commissioner
shall notify the insurer whether the risk-based capital plan shall be
implemented or is, in the judgment of the commissioner, unsatisfactory. If the
commissioner determines the risk-based capital plan is unsatisfactory, the notification
to the insurer shall set forth the reasons for the determination, and may set
forth proposed revisions which will render the risk-based capital plan
satisfactory, in the judgment of the commissioner. Upon notification from the
commissioner, the insurer shall prepare a revised risk-based capital plan,
which may incorporate by reference any revisions proposed by the commissioner,
and shall submit the revised risk-based capital plan to the commissioner:

(1) Within forty-five days after the notification
from the commissioner; or

(2) If the insurer challenges the notification from
the commissioner under section 431:3-407, within forty-five days after a
notification to the insurer that the commissioner has, after a hearing,
rejected the insurer's challenge.

(e) In the event of a notification by the
commissioner to an insurer that the insurer's risk-based capital plan or
revised risk-based capital plan is unsatisfactory, the commissioner, at the
commissioner's discretion, subject to the insurer's right to a hearing under
section 431:3-407, may specify in the notification that the notification
constitutes a regulatory action level event.

(f) Every domestic insurer that files a
risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based capital plan with the commissioner
shall file a copy of the risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based capital
plan with the insurance commissioner in any state in which the insurer is
authorized to do business if:

(1) That state has a risk-based capital provision
substantially similar to section 431:3-408(a); and

(2) The insurance commissioner of that state has
notified the insurer of its request for the filing in writing, in which case
the insurer shall file a copy of the risk-based capital plan or revised
risk-based capital plan in that state no later than the later of:

(A) Fifteen days after the receipt of notice
to file a copy of its risk-based capital plan or revised risk-based capital
plan with that state; or

(B) The date on which the risk-based capital
plan or revised risk-based capital plan is filed under subsections (c) and (d).
[L 1994, c 190, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 61, §2 as superseded by c 232, §4; am L
1997, c 75, §5; am L 1999, c 128, §2; am L 2003, c 212, §27; am L 2011, c 80,
§3; am L 2013, c 190, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next